Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.07.070

Election on reclassification—Effective date of reclassification upon favorable vote.

Notice of elections under this chapter shall be given, the election conducted, and the result declared generally as provided in chapter 35A.02 RCW, insofar as such provisions are applicable. If a majority of votes cast on the proposition are in favor of adoption of the classification of charter code city, upon the certification of the record of election to the office of the secretary of state, such city shall become a charter code city and shall be governed under the provisions of this title and have the powers conferred on charter code cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.07.070.]